dev/guesser/guesser.lexc
LEXICON PRON-PERS

мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:о PRON-P3SG-CASES ;

біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:біз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:біздіңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

сендер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:сендер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сендер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:сендерше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

олар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:олар PRON-PERS-INFL ;
олар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:оларша CLITICS-NO-COP ;

сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:сіз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:сіздіңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;
сіздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:сіздер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:сіздерше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

! FIXME CHECK (CLITICS-INCL-COP vs CLIT) I can't imagine forms like "бумын, бусың" etc.
! in Tatar, but not sure how it works in Kazakh /I.S./
!-----
! Good idea is to link prn.dem.sim forms alternatively to CLIT and CASE,
! so that it's "adverbial reading" (e.g. "шундый каты кычкырды") doesn't
! receive <nom> tag /IS/

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:дан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:нан CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME actually only "осы" seems to take this.
%<loc%>:нда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ндагы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ндай CASES ;  ! FIXME: should have <det>, etc.
%<advl%>:лай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<qnt%>:нша CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

! Commented out till these forms get implemented in tat.lexc too
!%<TD%>:шалық CLITICS-NO-COP ;        ! "that much"  ! FIXME: check cont lex
!%<reas%>%<abl%>:ндықтан # ; ! "because of"  ! FIXME: not attested with осы?

! FIXME: 1) link the below to PRON-DEM-INFL if possible
!            (later, once we are certain about things)

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

! FIXME CHECK (бұны vs мұны) Grammars I have list only forms with "б", but variants
! starting with "м" seem to be more frequent in the (wikipedia) corpus /I.S./
!-----
! <s>FIXME</s> (бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бұлар FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;) FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION might lead to
! overgeneration with p1,p2 possessives (they seem to take onle <px3sp> ending);
! on the other hand, with something like бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:монысы%{n%} CASES ;
! we loose things like бу<prn><dem><pl><px>:боларныкы /I.S./

бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бұл CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бұ CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:бұның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мұның CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:бұған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:бұны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:мұны CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:бұдан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мұнан CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:бұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:бұнымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:мұнымен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:мұнікі%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME: check "м" vs "б"
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:бұндағы ATTR-SUBST ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мұндағы ATTR-SUBST ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мұндай CASES ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:бұндай CASES ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:мұндай%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мұндайлар CASES ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мұндайлары%{n%} CASES ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<advl%>:былай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<advl%>:бұлай CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:мұнша CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:бұнысы%{n%} CASES ;

бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бұлар CASES-ETC ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:бұлары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINA

мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:мына CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мынаның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:мынаған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:мынаны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мынадан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мынада CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:мынамен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:мынанікі%{n%} CASES ;
!мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мынадағы ATTR-SUBST ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мынадай CASES ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<advl%>:мыналай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:мыналар CASES-ETC ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мыналары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINAU

мынау%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:мынау CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ANA

%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:дан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:да CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<ins%>:мен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:дағы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:дай CASES ;
!%<adv%>:лай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
!%<px3sp%>:сы%{n%} CASES ;

%<pl%>:лар CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:лар%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-BUL ;
PRON-DEM-MINA ;
PRON-DEM-MINAU ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>:ана PRON-DEM-ANA ;

сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:сол CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>:со PRON-DEM-INFL ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:сонымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:сонысы%{n%} CASES ;

ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ол CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>:о PRON-DEM-INFL ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:онымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:онысы%{n%} CASES ;

осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:осы CLITICS-NO-COP ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>:осы PRON-DEM-INFL ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:осымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:осысы%{n%} CASES ;

! FIXME DISCUSS: Two below were lexicalized as conjunctional adverbs.
! -ндықтан affix is a feature of verbs as well though, so it will be handled as a
! productive derivation.

!ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:ондықтан # ; ! "because of that"
!сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:сондықтан # ; ! "because of that"


!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

! Some of the words listed in the grammars I have as interrogative pronouns
! were placed in other root lexicons depending on what POS they substitute or
! act like syntactically. So (as planned for today):
! 1) "неше" is a <num><itg>;
! 2) "қайда, қайдан, қашан, қалай, қалайша" are <adv><itg> (the first three
! should link to a class containing location cases btw, as many current adverbs
! do);
! 3) "қанша" is added both as an interrogative pronoun and as an interrogative
! adverb /IS/ and det.qnt /JNW/
!
! What already added as interrogative pronouns are: кім, ни, нәрсе
! And to be added as interrogative pronouns are: қайсы, қандай, қанша.
! I'd like to mark қандай as <sim> form (with қандай for the upper side though),
! but wouldn't go too deeply into the structure of other two and not derive them
! from "қай" (that's what they have most likely originated from) IS
!
! Of course, "қай", "қайсы" and all other pronouns which can be used as an
! attribute were added as determiners linking to CLIT as well.
! Good idea is to have an rlx rule selecting determiner reading when a word is
! ambiguous between (prn X nom) and (det X) and there is noun to the right;
! and selecting pronoun if there is a verb to the right.

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI-CASES

%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:дан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:да CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:мен CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

%<prn%>%<itg%>: PRON-ITG-QAYSI-CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

! Might be not complete (қаншалар?)
! Currently қанша<prn><itg> is translated with ничә<num><itg><subst> and
! қанша<adv><itg> is going to be translated with "күпме" or "никадәр"

%<prn%>%<itg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>: CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ы%{n%} CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:лар CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:лары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

қайсы:қайсы PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
қанша:қанша PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
қандай:қандай PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;
нәрсе:нәрсе PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
не:не PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
немене:немене PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кім:кім PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-PL

%<prn%>%<ind%>%<pl%>: CASES ;


LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
%<advl%>:ше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSSESSIVES. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ; ! FIXME <px3sg>?
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     OTHER PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>:%- CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-Ә

:%{ә%} N1 ;            ! generate front for {I} and back for {A} - куәні, куәға
:ә%{ъ%} N1 ;  ! Dir/LR ! analyse all back forms
:ә N1 ;       ! Dir/LR ! analyse all front forms

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON
 
:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {S} needed here ?

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-PL
! for things like Олимпиада ойындары

%<n%>%<pl%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ; ! FIXME: do we want these to get <pl>??
